Utah statutes.
76-10-522.   Alteration of number or mark on pistol or revolver.

Any person who changes, alters, removes, or obliterates the name of the maker, the model, manufacturer's number, or other mark of identification, including any distinguishing number or mark assigned by the Department of Public Safety, on any pistol or revolver, without first having secured written permission from the Department of Public Safety to make the change, alteration, or removal, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

